Massachusetts, session 194th, H2169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of Chapter 94I of the General Laws is hereby amended by
deleting after the existing text “This chapter shall not: (i)” the following text:- "require any
health insurance provider, or any government agency or authority, to reimburse any person for
the expenses of the medical use of marijuana; (ii)” and, by deleting “(iii)” and substituting
therefor “(ii)”
SECTION 2. Section 30 of Chapter 152 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting, after the text
“Where services are provided to employees under this section, the reasonable and
necessary cost of such services shall be paid by the insurer.”, the following text: Such reasonable
of 2

and necessary service costs may include reimbursement for medical cannabis provided to injured
employees who are qualifying patients, or their personal caregiver, certified by a healthcare
professional pursuant to G.L. c. 94I as a qualifying patient, or serving as a qualifying patient's
personal caregiver under that chapter.
of 2